District of Columbia statutes.
22-4513

Exceptions.

Except as provided in § 22-4502, § 22-4504(b), and § 22-4514(b), this chapter shall not apply to toy or antique pistols unsuitable for use as firearms.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 653, Ch. 465, § 13
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 601, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 205(b)
May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-388, § 2(h), 56 DCR 1162
1981 Ed., § 22-3213.
1973 Ed., § 22-3213.
D.C. Law 17-388 substituted “§ 22-4502, § 22-4504(b), and § 22-4514(b)” for “§ 22-4502 and § 22-4514(b)”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Inoperable Pistol Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-652, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 927).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Inoperable Pistol Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-24, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2309).